Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,227
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-12,227 to 81-12,231 shall be known and may be cited as the Small Business Stabilization Grant Program Act.

Laws 2022, LB598, § 1.
April 20, 2022